Maryland, session 2025, SB0133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–101.
(a) In this title and Title 25 of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0133*

SENATE BILL 133
(c) “Bicycle path” means any travelway designed and designated by signing or
signing and marking for bicycle use, located within its own right–of–way or in a shared
right–of–way, and physically separated from motor vehicle traffic by berm, shoulder, curb,
or other similar device.
(e) “Bike lane” means any portion of a roadway or shoulder designated for single
directional bicycle flow.
21–1003.
(a) The provisions of this section apply except as necessary to avoid conflict with
other traffic or in compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or traffic control
device.
(GG) A PERSON MAY NOT STOP, STAND, OR PARK A VEHICLE IN A BIKE LANE
OR BICYCLE PATH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.